Wyoming, session 2025, SF0066.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

SF0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0086
(a) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the
University of Wyoming center for blockchain and digital
innovation in collaboration with the secretary of state
shall develop a filing system through which all required
filings, as defined in paragraph (d)(iii) of this section,
may be submitted and:

(i) Blockchain technology or other distributed
ledger technology shall be the technological framework for
the filing system. This may include an application
programming interface, security measures, authenticated
digital corporate identity and other components determined
by the secretary of state to be best practices and likely
to increase the effective and efficient administration of
the laws of this state;

(ii) To the extent reasonably possible, the
filing system shall be designed to accept existing and
future blockchain or other distributed ledger technology-
based filings including a digital asset lien registry,
digital identity registration and digital asset
registration;

SF0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0086
(iii) The University of Wyoming center for
blockchain and digital innovation may develop a blockchain
or other distributed ledger technology for the purposes of
this section or contract for the use of a privately created
blockchain or other distributed ledger technology as
necessary.

(b) The University of Wyoming center for blockchain
and digital innovation and the secretary of state may:

(i) Consult with interested parties before
developing the filing system required by subsection (a) of
this section, including businesses, registered agents,
attorneys, law enforcement and other interested persons;
and

(ii) If necessary, partner with technology
innovators and private companies to develop necessary
components of the filing system.

(c) The secretary of state may allow for the testing
and implementation of the filing system developed pursuant
to this act at the secretary's discretion. Nothing in this
SF0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0086
act shall require the secretary of state to implement the
filing system developed pursuant to this act.

(d) As used in this section:

(i) "Application programming interface" means a
computer software intermediary or protocol that allows two
(2) or more distinct software applications to interact;

(ii) "Blockchain" means a digital ledger or
database that is chronological, consensus-based,
decentralized and mathematically verified in nature;

(iii) "Required filings" means all documents,
reports, data and other information required by law to be
filed with the secretary of state pursuant to title 17,
title 34.1, title 34 or title 40 of the Wyoming statutes.

Section 2. The secretary of state may adopt rules to
implement this act.

Section 3.

SF0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0086
(a) Beginning on April 1, 2025 the first two million
dollars ($2,000,000.00) collected under W.S. 17-16-1630
shall be deposited in the digital ledger filing system
account which is hereby created.

(b) There is appropriated two million dollars
($2,000,000.00) from the digital ledger filing system
account to the University of Wyoming center for blockchain
and digital innovation for developing the filing system
required by this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2027. Funds from the account will be
distributed quarterly as they become available until the
full amount appropriated under this subsection is
distributed. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert to the general fund on June 30, 2027.

SF0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0086
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0066